Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.230

Sales of stock—Imposition of conditions.

With respect to sales of stock by an association, the director may impose conditions requiring the impoundment of the proceeds from the sale of stock, limiting the expense in connection with the sale of such stock, and other conditions as he or she deems reasonable and necessary or advisable to insure the disposition of the proceeds from the sale of such stock in the manner and for the purposes provided in the permit.

[ 1994 c 92 s 488; 1982 c 3 s 105; 1973 c 130 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.